Utah statutes.
16-6a-1605.   Limitations on use of membership list.
(1)  Without consent of the board of directors, a membership list or any part
of a membership list may not be obtained or used by any person for any purpose
unrelated to a member's interest as a member.
(2)  Without limiting the generality of Subsection (1), without the consent of
the board of directors, a membership list or any part of a membership list may
not be:
(a)  used to solicit money or property unless the money or property will be
used solely to solicit the votes of the members in an election to be held by
the nonprofit corporation;
(b)  used for any commercial purpose; or
(c)  sold to or purchased by any person.
